src/articles.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +DefArt +IndefArt +Mas +Fem +Sg +Pl


LEXICON Root

el+DefArt+Mas+Sg:el		#;
el+DefArt+Fem+Sg:la		#;
el+DefArt+Mas+Pl:els	#;
el+DefArt+Fem+Pl:les	#;

un+IndefArt+Mas+Sg:un 	#;
un+IndefArt+Fem+Sg:una	#;
un+IndefArt+Mas+Pl:uns	#;
un+IndefArt+Fem+Pl:unes	#;
